Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2206
Department, defined.

Department shall mean the Division of Medicaid and Long-Term Care of the Department of Health and Human Services.

Laws 1982, LB 404, § 6;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 871;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 763.